Tennessee, session 114, SB0017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-105, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(1) All law enforcement agencies and officials shall, in accordance with 8 U.S.C.
§ 1357(g)(10), communicate with the appropriate federal official regarding the
immigration status of any individual who has been arrested for a criminal offense,
including reporting knowledge that a particular alien is not lawfully present in the United
States or otherwise cooperate with the appropriate federal official in the identification,
apprehension, detention, or removal of aliens not lawfully present in the United States.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) does not apply to:
(A) A school resource officer with regard to the immigration status of a
student of the local education agency to which the school resource officer has
been assigned; and
(B) An individual who has not been arrested by the law enforcement
agency or official, including an individual whose contact with a law enforcement
agency is due to the individual's status as a victim of or witness to a criminal
offense.
(3) A law enforcement agency that does not comply with the requirements of
subdivision (a)(1) may be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of no more than one
SB0017
000083
- 1 -

thousand dollars ($1,000). An action to enforce such civil penalty may be brought by the
attorney general and reporter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000083